Colorado statutes. TITLE 11 Financial Institutions
ARTICLE 51.5
INVESTOR PROTECTION

11-51.5-101 to 11-51.5-108. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 84:

Entire article repealed, p. 398, § 8, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This article was added in 1975. For amendments to this article prior to its repeal in 1984, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume.